Nebraska, session 109, LB875.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB875 LB875
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 87-704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
87-704 It shall be a violation of the Equipment Business Regulation
Act for a supplier:
(1) To require a dealer to accept delivery of equipment, repair
parts, or attachments that the dealer has not voluntarily ordered;
(2) To require a dealer to order or accept delivery of equipment
with special features or attachments not included in the base list price
of such equipment as publicly advertised by the supplier;
(3) To require a dealer to enter into any agreement, whether written
or oral, amendatory or supplementary to an existing dealer agreement with
the supplier unless such amendatory or supplementary agreement is imposed
on similarly situated dealers;
(4) To take action terminating, canceling, failing to renew, or
substantially changing the competitive circumstances intended by the
dealer agreement due to the results of conditions beyond the dealer's
control, including drought, flood, labor disputes, or economic recession.
This subdivision shall not apply if the dealer is in default of a
security agreement in effect with the supplier; and
(5) To condition the renewal or extension of a dealer agreement on
(a) the dealer's substantial renovation of its place of business or the
construction, purchase, acquisition, or rental of a new place of business
by the dealer unless the supplier advises the dealer in writing of its
demand for such renovation, construction, purchase, acquisition, or
rental within a reasonable time prior to the effective date of the
proposed renewal or extension, but in no case less than one year prior to
such date, or (b) capital construction exceeding the terms of the dealer
agreement in force and effect on May 2, 1991; .
(6) To include any condition, stipulation, or provision in any
dealer agreement purporting to waive compliance with any provision of the
Equipment Business Regulation Act or any other provision of state law
-2-

LB875 LB875
2026 2026
applying to such agreements; or
(7) To include any provision in any dealer agreement restricting
jurisdiction or venue to a forum outside this state or requiring the
application of the laws of another state to disputes arising under the
agreement.
Sec. 2. Section 87-706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
87-706 (1) A supplier shall provide for the availability of repair
parts throughout the reasonable useful life of any equipment sold.
(2) A supplier shall at least annually provide dealers an
opportunity to return surplus repair parts for credit without
restrictions as follows:
(a)(i) The supplier may notify the dealers of a surplus parts return
program for a time period of at least sixty days in duration during which
dealers may submit a list of their surplus parts and return the parts to
the supplier; or
(ii) If twelve months have elapsed and the supplier has not notified
a dealer of a surplus parts return program, the dealer may submit to the
supplier a request to return surplus parts and the supplier shall allow
the dealer to return the parts within thirty days after receipt of the
request;
(b) Subject to the other provisions of this section, a supplier
shall allow a dealer to return parts with a dollar value equal to at
least six percent of the total dollar value of parts purchased by the
dealer from the supplier or the supplier's predecessor in interest during
the twelve-month period immediately preceding either the notification to
the dealer of the supplier's surplus parts return program or the month
the dealer's return request is made, whichever is applicable. A dealer
may elect to return a dollar value of parts equal to less than six
percent of such total dollar value of parts purchased;
(c) An obsolete or superseded part may not be returned, except that
-3-

LB875 LB875
2026 2026
any part listed in the supplier's current list of returnable parts and
any superseded part that has not been the subject of a surplus parts
return program as of the date of notification to the dealer by the
supplier of the current surplus parts return program or the date of the
dealer's request to return surplus parts, whichever is applicable, shall
be eligible for return;
(d) To be eligible for return, parts must be in new and unused
condition and must have been purchased by the dealer from the supplier to
whom they are returned or the supplier's predecessor in interest;
(e) The supplier shall allow credit for a returned part of at least
eighty-five percent of the current price of the part as listed in the
supplier's effective price list or catalog at the date of the
notification to the dealer by the supplier of the surplus parts return
program or the date of the dealer's request to return surplus parts,
whichever is applicable, or, if there is no effective price list or
catalog, in the supplier's invoices;
(f) The supplier shall issue credit to the dealer within ninety days
after receipt of the parts returned by the dealer;
(g) The dealer shall be presumed to have purchased the returned
parts from the supplier or the supplier's predecessor in interest, and
the burden shall be on the supplier to prove otherwise;
(h) The provisions of this section shall be supplemental to any
agreement between the dealer and the supplier covering the return of
parts which provides the dealer with greater protection;
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the
existence or enforcement of a security interest which any person may have
in the parts of the dealer; and
(j) Nothing in this section shall preclude a credit for returned
parts which is greater than the total amount authorized by this section.
(3) The annual parts return provided for in subsection (2) of this
section may be waived by a dealer. If a majority of dealers from a single
-4-

LB875 LB875
2026 2026
supplier choose to waive the provisions of such subsection, the supplier
shall be exempt from such subsection.
Sec. 3. Original sections 87-704 and 87-706, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-